Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.280

Classification of licenses—Limitations and conditions of licenses.

If the administrator determines, by rule, that one or more classifications of licenses as a commodity broker-dealer or commodity sales representative which are subject to limitations and conditions on the nature of the activities which may be conducted by those persons are consistent with the public interest and the protection of investors, the administrator may authorize the licensing of persons subject to specific limitations and conditions.

[ 1986 c 14 s 29.]